Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 1. General Provisions.

Sec. 13.26.001.
Adoption of standards of practice.

It is the policy of the state that all guardians and conservators, when making decisions for their wards or protected persons, shall abide by the highest ethical standards of decision making and shall consider the standards of practice adopted by the department by regulation. The department shall adopt standards of practice for guardians and conservators and, before doing so, shall review the standards of practice adopted by a national organization with expertise in the area of standards of practice for guardians and conservators, such as the National Guardianship Association.

History.

(§ 3 ch 84 SLA 2004)

Sec. 13.26.005.
Definitions and use of terms.

Unless otherwise apparent from the context, in AS 13.06 — AS 13.36,

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development;

“essential requirements for physical health or safety” means the health care, food, shelter, clothing, personal hygiene, and protection without which serious physical injury or illness is more likely than not to occur;

“full guardian” means a guardian who possesses the legal duties and powers enumerated in AS

13.26.316(c)

;

“guardian” includes full guardian and partial guardian;

“incapacitated person” means a person whose ability to receive and evaluate information or to communicate decisions is impaired for reasons other than minority to the extent that the person lacks the ability to provide the essential requirements for the person’s physical health or safety without court-ordered assistance;

“partial guardian” means a guardian who possesses fewer than all of the legal duties and powers of a full guardian, and whose rights, powers, and duties have been specifically enumerated by court order;

“private professional conservator” means a person, other than the public guardian, who is licensed under AS 08.26 or exempt under AS

08.26.180

;

“private professional guardian” means a person, other than the public guardian, who is licensed under AS 08.26 or exempt under AS

08.26.180

;

a “protected person” is a minor or other person for whom a conservator has been appointed or other protective order has been made;

a “protective proceeding” is a proceeding under the provisions of AS

13.26.401

to determine that a person cannot effectively manage or apply the person’s estate to necessary ends, either because the person lacks the ability or is otherwise inconvenienced, or because the person is a minor, and to secure administration of the estate by a conservator or other appropriate relief;

“respondent” means a person who, in a guardianship proceeding under this chapter, is alleged to be an incapacitated person and for whom the appointment of a guardian or alternative assistance is sought; “respondent” includes a person seeking the appointment of a guardian or alternative assistance for oneself;

“visitor” means a person trained or experienced in law, medical care, mental health care, pastoral care, education, rehabilitation, or social work, who is an officer, employee, or special appointee of the court with no personal interest in the proceedings;

a “ward” is a person for whom a guardian has been appointed; a “minor ward” is a minor for whom a guardian has been appointed solely because of minority.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am §§ 1, 2 ch 83 SLA 1981; am § 4 ch 84 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1985 and 2004 to alphabetize the defined terms.

In 2016, in paragraph (3) “AS

13.26.316(c)

” was substituted for “AS 13.26.150(c)” and in paragraph (10) “AS

13.26.401

” was substituted for “AS

13.26.165

” to reflect the renumbering of those sections.

Sec. 13.26.010.
Jurisdiction of subject matter; consolidation of proceedings.

The court has jurisdiction over protective proceedings and guardianship proceedings.

When both guardianship and protective proceedings as to the same person are commenced or pending in the same court, the proceedings may be consolidated.

This section is subject to the requirements of AS 13.27 (Uniform Adult Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction Act).

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 13 ch 53 SLA 2008)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2008 amendment, effective September 2, 2008, added subsection (c).

Secs. 13.26.013 — 13.26.020.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.021, 13.26.031 and 13.26.051.]

Sec. 13.26.021.
Court records of proceedings; access; sealing.

A notice of the filing of a petition, a summary of all formal proceedings, and a dispositional order or modification or termination of a dispositional order relating to a proceeding under this chapter shall be available for public inspection. All other information contained in the court records relating to a proceeding under this chapter is confidential and available only upon court order for good cause shown or to the following persons:

the person who is the subject of the court record, the person’s attorney, or the person’s guardian ad litem;

a person designated by the person who is the subject of the court record;

the guardian of the person who is the subject of the court record or the attorney of the guardian;

the conservator of the estate of the person who is the subject of the court record or the attorney of the conservator;

a party to the proceeding and the person’s attorney;

the judge or judges hearing or reviewing the matter;

a member of the clerical or administrative staff of the court if access is essential for authorized internal administrative purposes; and

the department when a private professional guardian or a private professional conservator is involved in the proceeding.

Upon finding that a petition under this chapter was malicious, frivolous, or without just cause, the court may order that all information contained in the court records relating to the proceeding be sealed and that the information be disclosed only upon court order for good cause shown.

History.

(§ 3 ch 83 SLA 1981; am § 5 ch 84 SLA 2004)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.013

; renumbered in 2016.

Secs. 13.26.025, 13.26.030.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.041 and 13.26.101.]

Sec. 13.26.031.
Facility of payment or delivery.

Any person under a duty to pay or deliver money or personal property to a minor may perform this duty, in amounts not exceeding $5,000 a year, by paying or delivering the money or property to (1) the minor, if the minor is married; (2) any person having the care and custody of the minor with whom the minor resides; (3) a guardian of the minor; or (4) a financial institution incident to a deposit in a federally insured savings account in the sole name of the minor and giving notice of the deposit to the minor. This section does not apply if the person making payment or delivery has actual knowledge that a conservator has been appointed or proceedings for appointment of a conservator of the estate of the minor are pending. The persons, other than the minor or any financial institution under (4) of this section, receiving money or property for a minor, are obligated to apply the money to the support and education of the minor, but may not pay themselves except by way of reimbursement for out-of-pocket expenses for goods and services necessary for the minor’s support. Any excess sums shall be preserved for future support of the minor and any balance not so used and any property received for the minor must be turned over to the minor when the minor attains majority. Persons who pay or deliver in accordance with provisions of this section are not responsible for the proper application thereof.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 22 ch 56 SLA 1973; am § 6 ch 99 SLA 2004)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.015; renumbered in 2016.

Secs. 13.26.035, 13.26.40.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.121 and 13.26.126.]

Sec. 13.26.041.
Appointment of a guardian ad litem.

Upon the request of a ward, protected person, or respondent, or the attorney of a ward, protected person, or respondent, the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem to protect the rights of the ward, protected person, or respondent in proceedings under AS

13.26.201

—

13.26.580

. The court shall make the appointment if the court is satisfied that, because of impaired ability effectively to receive and evaluate information regarding the proceedings or because of impaired ability to communicate decisions regarding the proceedings, the ward, protected person, or respondent is incapable of determining the ward’s, protected person’s, or respondent’s position regarding the issues involved in the pending proceedings, and

a guardian or conservator has not been appointed;

the interests of the ward, protected person, or respondent conflict with those of the ward’s, protected person’s, or respondent’s guardian or conservator; or

the appointment is otherwise in the interests of justice.

The guardian ad litem shall assist the ward, protected person, or respondent in determining the ward’s, protected person’s, or respondent’s interests in regard to the legal proceedings that involve the ward, protected person, or respondent. If the ward, protected person, or respondent is entirely incapable of determining those interests, the guardian ad litem shall make the determination of those interests and advise the court and counsel for all parties accordingly. The guardian ad litem shall

inquire thoroughly into all the circumstances that a prudent ward, protected person, or respondent would consider in determining the ward’s, protected person’s, or respondent’s own interests in the proceedings, including any prior relevant statements made or actions taken by the ward, protected person, or respondent; and

encourage the ward, protected person, or respondent to participate, to the maximum extent possible, in all decisions and to act on the ward’s, protected person’s, or respondent’s own behalf on all matters in which the ward, protected person, or respondent is able.

The attorney for the ward, protected person, or respondent may be appointed as the guardian ad litem for the ward, protected person, or respondent if there is no other party readily available and able to serve as a guardian ad litem and the court determines that the appointment is appropriate under the standards set out in (a) of this section. When a person who has been appointed by the court as the attorney for the ward, protected person, or respondent is appointed to act as the guardian ad litem for the ward, protected person, or respondent under this subsection, the appointment of the person as the attorney ends, and the person appointed as the guardian ad litem shall act exclusively as a guardian ad litem for the ward, protected person, or respondent.

The office of public advocacy shall provide guardian ad litem services to persons who would suffer financial hardship or become dependent upon a government agency or a private person or agency if the services were not to be provided at state expense.

History.

(§ 6 ch 84 SLA 2004)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.025

; renumbered in 2016 at which time in subsection (a) “AS

13.26.201

—

13.26.580

” was substituted for “AS 13.26.090 —

13.26.320

” to reflect the renumbering of those sections.

Secs. 13.26.045, 13.26.050.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.132, and 13.26.137.]

Sec. 13.26.051.
Delegation of powers over incapacitated adult by parent or guardian.

A parent or a guardian of an adult incapacitated person, by a properly executed power of attorney, may delegate to another person, for a period not exceeding one year, any powers regarding care, custody, or property of the adult incapacitated person.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 28 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.020; renumbered in 2016.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective September 20, 2016, substituted “an adult incapacitated person” for “a minor or incapacitated person” and “adult incapacitated person” for “minor child or ward, except the power to consent to marriage or adoption of a minor ward”.

Secs. 13.26.055 — 13.26.065.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.143, 13.26.147, 13.26.153, 13.26.157, and 13.26.162.]

Sec. 13.26.066.
Delegation of powers over minor child.

A parent or a guardian of a minor child, by a properly executed power of attorney that is substantially in the form provided in (f) of this section, may delegate to another person one or more powers regarding the care or custody of the minor child, except the power to consent to

the marriage or adoption of the minor child;

the performance or inducement of an abortion on or for the minor child; or

the termination of parental rights to the minor child.

A parent or guardian of a minor child may revoke the power of attorney made by the parent or guardian under (a) of this section at any time. A parent of a minor child may revoke a power of attorney that another parent of the minor child has made under (a) of this section. A guardian of a minor child may revoke a power of attorney that another guardian of the minor child has made under (a) of this section. If a parent or guardian revokes a power of attorney, the attorney-in-fact shall return the minor child to the custody of the parent or the guardian as soon as reasonably possible after the revocation.

Except as provided in (d) of this section, a power of attorney under this section is not effective for a period that exceeds one year. However, after a power of attorney expires under this subsection, a parent or guardian may enter into a new power of attorney.

A power of attorney made by a military parent or guardian may be effective for a period that exceeds one year if the military parent or guardian is on active duty, but the power of attorney is not effective for a period that exceeds the length of the active duty plus 30 days.

Unless a parent or guardian revokes a power of attorney, the attorney-in- fact shall exercise the power in the power of attorney without compensation for the duration of the power of attorney.

To designate an attorney-in-fact, a parent or guardian shall execute a power of attorney that is in substantially the following form:

A power of attorney does not change parental rights, legal rights, obligations, or other authority established by an existing court order and does not deprive the parent or guardian of rights, obligations, or other authority relating to the custody, visitation, or support of the minor child.

Except as otherwise determined under another statute, the execution of a power of attorney by a parent or guardian does not constitute abandonment, neglect, or abuse of the minor child or ward under AS

47.10.013

-

47.10.015

, unless the parent or guardian fails, after the power of attorney terminates, to retake custody of the child and does not execute a new power of attorney.

Under a power of attorney, a minor child is not considered to be in foster care, and the attorney-in-fact is not considered to be providing foster care for which a license is required under AS 47.32.

In this section,

“active duty” means military duties that are performed full time;

“attorney-in-fact” means the individual to whom a parent or guardian gives a power under a power of attorney;

“foster care” means care provided by a person for which a foster home license is required by AS 47.32;

“guardian” means a natural person who is legally appointed the guardian of a minor child by the court under this chapter;

“military parent or guardian” means a person who is a parent or guardian of a minor and who is a member of

the armed forces of the United States;

a reserve component of the armed forces of the United States;

the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration Commissioned Officer Corps or the United States Public Health Service Commissioned Corps, if the member is

assigned by proper authority to duty with the armed forces of the United States; or

required to serve on active duty with the armed forces of the United States under a call or order of the President of the United States, or to serve on active duty with the military forces of the state;

“minor child” means a natural person who is under 18 years of age, including a stepchild or a grandchild, but not including a foster child;

“parent” includes a stepparent or a grandparent, and a parent who is incarcerated for a criminal conviction, but not a foster parent;

“power of attorney” means a power of attorney entered into under this section.

TO DELEGATE THE POWERS OF A PARENT OR GUARDIAN STATUTORY FORM FOR POWER OF ATTORNEY Section 1. I certify that I am the parent or guardian of (Full name of minor child) (Date of birth) (Full name of minor child) (Date of birth) (Full name of minor child) (Date of birth) who is/are minor children. Section 2. I designate (Full name of attorney- in-fact), (Street address, city, state, and zip code of attorney-in-fact) (Home telephone of attorney-in-fact) (Work telephone of attorney-in-fact) as the attorney-in-fact of each minor child named above. Section 3. I delegate to the attorney-in-fact all of my power and authority regarding the care and custody of each minor child named above, including the right to enroll the child in school, the right to inspect and obtain copies of education records and other records concerning the child, the right to attend school activities and other functions concerning the child, and the right to give or withhold any consent or waiver with respect to school activities, medical treatment, dental treatment, and other activity, function, or treatment that may concern the minor child. This delegation does not include the power or authority to consent to the marriage or adoption of the minor child, the performance or inducement of an abortion on or for the minor child, or the termination of parental rights to the minor child. OR Section 4. I delegate to my attorney-in-fact the following specific powers and responsibilities (write in): Delegation under this section does not include the power or authority to consent to the marriage or adoption of the minor child, the performance or inducement of an abortion on or for the minor child, or the termination of parental rights to the minor child. (If you complete Section 4, Section 3 does not apply). Section 5. This power of attorney is effective for a period not to exceed one year, beginning , 20 , and ending , 20 . I reserve the right to revoke this authority at any time. OR Section 6. I am a military parent or guardian under AS

13.26.066(d)

. My active duty is scheduled to begin on , 20 , and is estimated to end on , 20 . I acknowledge that this power of attorney will not last more than one year, or the term of my active duty service plus 30 days, whichever period is longer. By: (Parent/guardian signature) Section 7. I hereby accept my designation as attorney-in-fact for the minor child/children identified in this power of attorney. (Attorney-in-fact signature) State of Judicial District ACKNOWLEDGMENT Before me, the undersigned, a Notary Public, in and for the Judicial District and State identified above, on this day of , 20 , personally appeared (name of parent/guardian) and (name of attorney-in-fact), to me known to be the persons who executed this power of attorney, and each acknowledged to me that each executed the same as the person’s free and voluntary act and deed for the uses and purposes set out in this power of attorney. Witness my hand and official seal the day and year written above. (Signature of notary public) (Seal, if any) (Title and rank) My commission expires:

Click to view

History.

(§ 2 ch 28 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS 13.26.023; renumbered in 2016 at which time an internal reference was also conformed.

Effective dates. —

Section 2, ch. 28, SLA 2016, which enacted this section, took effect on September 20, 2016.

Secs. 13.26.070 — 13.26.100.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.167, 13.26.171, 13.26.181, 13.26.186, 13.26.201, 13.26.211, and 13.26.216.]